Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1005
Apprentice, defined.

Apprentice means a person engaged in the study of any or all of the practices of cosmetology under the supervision of an instructor in an apprentice salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-344;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 267;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 5.